Washington statutes.
RCW 43.08.040

Administration of oaths.

The treasurer may administer all oaths required by law in matters pertaining to the duties of his or her office.

[ 2009 c 549 s 5034; 1965 c 8 s 43.08.040. Prior: 1890 p 643 s 5; RRS s 11024; prior: 1886 p 135 s 5; 1871 p 78 s 5; 1864 p 53 s 6; 1854 p 414 s 6.]